Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 22 Extension of Veterans’ Benefits

30-22-1.
World War II veterans.

The provisions of all of the statutes of this state granting benefits or privileges to veterans of any war in which the United States of America has heretofore been engaged, or to the widow or widower or domestic partner or other surviving kin of deceased veterans of that war, shall hereafter be construed to provide for like benefits and privileges for any veteran of World War II who has heretofore been, or may hereafter be, honorably discharged from the armed forces of this nation and to the widow or widower or domestic partner or other surviving kin of any such deceased veteran of said war.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1220, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-22-1

; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 9; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 44.

30-22-2.
Merchant marine.

All credits, benefits, and privileges, excepting bonuses, granted and bestowed as of December 7, 1941 by the state upon men and women in the armed forces of the United States of America and then enjoyed by those armed forces, shall be extended to include members of the American merchant marine service, who, at the date of enlistment, were legal residents of the state; provided, however, that those members of the American merchant marine service shall have been in service for at least six (6) months, but in the event any member shall meet death before the expiration of that six (6) months of service, he or she shall receive all credits, benefits, and privileges to which he or she would have been entitled by this section had death not intervened in that six-months’ service.

All eligible members under this section shall file with the department of veterans affairs for a discharge certificate on forms provided by the department of veterans affairs for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1308, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-22-2

; P.L. 1988, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 44.

30-22-3.
Veterans of undeclared wars or campaigns.

The provisions of all of the statutes of this state granting benefits, privileges, or bonuses to veterans of any war in which the United States of America has heretofore been engaged, or to the widow or widower or domestic partner or other surviving kin of deceased veterans of that war, shall hereafter be construed to provide for like benefits, privileges and bonuses for any man or woman of the armed forces who has been engaged heretofore, is now, or may hereafter be engaged in the active conduct of and/or fighting in the Korean Campaign or the conflict in Vietnam or any following campaign or war, declared or undeclared, which the armed forces of the United States of America conduct or in which those forces have a part, and who, having been actively engaged as hereinbefore described, has heretofore been, or may hereafter be, honorably discharged from the armed forces of this nation, and to the widow or widower or domestic partner or other surviving kin of any such deceased veteran of that campaign or war.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2754, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-22-3

; P.L. 1968, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 252, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 9; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 44.

30-22-4.
“Korean service” defined.

“Active conduct of and/or fighting in the Korean Campaign” shall mean service by any man or woman of the armed forces of the United States between June 27, 1950, and January 31, 1955, inclusive. Provided, however, that the extension of the date from July 27, 1953, to January 31, 1955, in the definition of Korean service shall not entitle any veteran who served between July 27, 1953, to January 31, 1955, to any bonus previously paid, nor to any veteran’s tax exemption pursuant to §

44-3-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2754, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3230, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3443, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-22-4

; P.L. 1977, ch. 201, § 1.

30-22-5.
“Vietnam service” defined.

“Active conduct of and/or fighting in the Vietnam Conflict” shall mean service by any man or woman of the armed forces of the United States between February 28, 1961, and May 7, 1975, inclusive. Provided, however, that the extension of the date from August 5, 1964, to February 28, 1961, in the definition of the Vietnam Conflict shall not entitle any veteran who served between February 28, 1961, and August 5, 1964, to any bonus previously paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 252, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 20, § 1.

30-22-6.
Domestic partner defined.

For purposes of this chapter, “domestic partner” shall be defined as a person who, prior to the decedent’s death, was in an exclusive, intimate, and committed relationship with the decedent, and who certifies, by affidavit, that their relationship met the following qualifications:

Both partners were at least eighteen (18) years of age and were mentally competent to contract;

Neither partner was married to anyone else;

Partners were not related by blood to a degree that would prohibit marriage in the state of Rhode Island;

Partners resided together and had resided together for at least one year at the time of death; and

Partners were financially interdependent as evidenced by at least two (2) of the following:

Domestic partnership agreement or relationship contract;

Joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence;

Two (2) of: (A) joint ownership of motor vehicle; (B) joint checking account; (C) joint credit account; (D) joint lease; and/or

The domestic partner had been designated as a beneficiary for the decedent’s will, retirement contract, or life insurance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 10; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 44.